District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

31-5705

Service of process on nonresident associations.

Repealed.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1312, ch. 854, § 753
May 21, 1997, D.C. Law 11-268, § 10(n), 44 DCR 1730
Apr. 29, 1998, D.C. Law 12-86, § 1237(a), 45 DCR 1172
1981 Ed., § 35-1205.

Former § 35-1205 1981 Ed. had also been amended by D.C. Law 10-128.

D.C. Law 11-268, § 10(n) ( 44 DCR 1730), eff. May 21, 1997, amends § 35-1205 1981 Ed. without reference to its prior repeal.